inc/flattened/otw.lexc
LEXICON VTI_TAG 
+VTI:0  VTI_ORDERS_GET ;


LEXICON PA
gchi-:gichi    AV    " 1 very;  2 the unit period after (with time expressions)" ; !Rand key:n2010121223-12-33n
wasi-:awasi-    AV    " 1 used with a time adverbial to indicate the period before last, e.g., <nish>wasi-bboonong</nish>, 'the year before last'" ; !Rand key:n201132612-19-17n
ewaanji-:ewaanji-    AV    " 1 the most, to the greatest extent, degree, quality or quantity" ; !Rand key:n20114911-51-32n
                AV ;

LEXICON AV_TAG
+Adv:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 

!! Numerals

LEXICON QNT
gkina:gakina    QNT_TAG    " 1 all, every;  2 entirely, completely, all;  3 all over, over all of an object or expanse, the entirety of something;  4 everything;  5 all gone!" ; !Rand key:n73028948619n
kina:akina    QNT_TAG    " 1 all, every;  2 be all gone" ; !Rand key:n71428961278n
niibna:niibina    QNT_TAG    " 1 lots, many, much" ; !Rand key:n71431749323n
niimna:niimVv1na    QNT_TAG    " 1 [see niibna]" ; !Rand key:n71431757489n

LEXICON QNT_TAG
+Qnt:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ;
!! Pronouns
LEXICON PR
    PR_NI ;
    PR_NA ;

LEXICON PR_NI
dnawa:dinawa    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 kind, sort" ; !Rand key:n72989351035n
gaawn-gegoon:gaawin-gegoon    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 nothing" ; !Rand key:n73017375493n
gchi-gegoo:gichi-gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 something big, something major, something of great significance" ; !Rand key:n73019342809n
gegoo:gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 any, anything, something" ; !Rand key:n73019738575n
gegoon:gegoon    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 [see gegoo]" ; !Rand key:n73020045271n
gewii:gewii    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 it, it, too, [it] too;  2 as for..." ; !Rand key:n73020082697n
iw:iw    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 that (in.);  2 it (in.)" ; !Rand key:n73028046927n
!kaawn gegoo:kaawn gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 nothing" ; !Rand key:n73016755416n
maanda:maanda    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 this;  2 here is a...; here it is!" ; !Rand key:n71429179465n
nanda:nanda    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 these, they" ; !Rand key:n71431161387n
ni-wediin:ni-wediin    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 those over there" ; !Rand key:n71433039722n
niw:Vi1niw    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 those" ; !Rand key:n71433039424n
niwedi:Vi1niwedi    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 those over there" ; !Rand key:n71433039582n
niwi:Vi1niwi    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 those" ; !Rand key:n71433039962n
niwin:Vi1niwin    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 those" ; !Rand key:n73099341835n
nonda:anonda    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 [see nanda]" ; !Rand key:n71433756270n
ow:ow    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 this" ; !Rand key:n71435146899n
waagnen:waagonen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 what?" ; !Rand key:n73032212628n
wagdagwen:wagodagwen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 something or other, whatever, who knows what" ; !Rand key:n7303277668n
wegdogwen:wegodogwen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 whatever" ; !Rand key:n73032777964n
wegnen:wegonen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 what" ; !Rand key:n73032778020n
wegnesh:wegonesh    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 what;  2 which (one or ones)" ; !Rand key:n73032778060n
wegwen:awegwen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 something or other, whatever" ; !Rand key:n73032778235n
wegwenh:awegwenh    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 [see wegwen]" ; !Rand key:n73032778442n
wene:awene    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 what?" ; !Rand key:n73032782103n
wenen:awenen    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 what?" ; !Rand key:n73032782173n
wenesh:awenesh    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 [see wegnesh]" ; !Rand key:n73032782272n
wi:iwi    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 that (inan.), it" ; !Rand key:n73032950283n
dwa:dowa    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 kind, sort" ; !Rand key:n201132911-15-5n
!kina gegoo:gakina gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 everything;  2 in every way, in every respect, of every sort" ; !Rand key:n201133017-46-51n
!gaa wii gegoo:gaa wii gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 nothing" ; !Rand key:n201133017-57-51n
!gaawii gegoo:gaawii gegoo    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 no (inanimate thing), there is no (indicating the absence of something)" ; !Rand key:n20114914-31-51n
!wi bezhik:wi bezhig    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 that other one (in.)" ; !Rand key:n20114915-26-36n
!maanda bezhik:maanda bezhig    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 this other one (in.)" ; !Rand key:n20114915-31-31n
!mii wi:mii wi    PR_NI_TAG    " 1 that's what (in.)" ; !Rand key:n20114916-11-39n

LEXICON PR_NI_TAG
+Pron+NI:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ;

LEXICON PR_NA_TAG
+Pron+NA:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ;

LEXICON PCL
CJ ;
IJ ;
PT ;

LEXICON CJ
giishpin:giishpin    CJ_TAG    " 1 if;  2 or else, otherwise" ; !Rand key:n73023754109n
giishpine:giishpine    CJ_TAG    " 1 if" ; !Rand key:n73023754407n
gye:gaye    CJ_TAG    " 1 and (coordinating);  2 also, as well, in addition, too (additive);  3 and then... (narrative sequencing);  4 as for, for one's part, with regard to..." ; !Rand key:n73032325988n
mii'sh:mii-sh    CJ_TAG    " 1 and so, so, then, so then" ; !Rand key:n73036925045n
shi:ashi    CJ_TAG    " 1 and (with numbers)" ; !Rand key:n73031386177n
gjiishpin:gijiishpin    CJ_TAG    " 1 if" ; !Rand key:n20114115-1-41n
jibwaa:Vv1jibwaa    CJ_TAG    " 1 before, at a time preceding (some other event or state)" ; !Rand key:n2011439-57-22n

LEXICON CJ_TAG
+Conj:0 CLOSED_PROTECTION ;

LEXICON VTI
aateshkaan:aateshkam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 put sth. out [with the foot or body], stamp sth. out  (of fire, something burning)" ; !Rand key:n72974044952n
baashk'aan:baashkaham1    VTI_TAG    " 1 break sth. open [with an instrument] (of ball-like objects)" ; !Rand key:n72975356330n
bgone'aan:bagonehan VTI_TAG    " 1 make a hole in sth. [with an instrument], put a hole in sth. [with an instrument]" ; !Rand key:n72976846814n
biindaabkiwebnaan:biindaabikiwebinam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 put sth. in the oven, throw sth. in the oven" ; !Rand key:n72977281879n
bkwebdoon:bakwebidoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 break a piece of sth. off" ; !Rand key:n72977653532n
bookjiisdoon:bookojiisidoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 break sth. in half from striking it on something (of elongated objects)" ; !Rand key:n72980546356n
bwa'aan:bawaham1    VTI_TAG    " 1 dust sth. off" ; !Rand key:n72985137584n
dagaabaawdoon:Vv1dagaabaawidoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 soften sth. [by soaking], soften sth. [with water]" ; !Rand key:n73031818021n
dkondaan:dakondam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 bite sth., bite on sth." ; !Rand key:n73013750224n
gaashkshkoodoon:gaashkishkoodoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 get sth. scratched [with a weight]" ; !Rand key:n73017370779n
giibdaabaadaan:giibidaabaadam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 drag sth. down off of something" ; !Rand key:n73021441695n
gjijiiyaan:gojijiiham1    VTI_TAG    " 1 prick sth. to test its doneness" ; !Rand key:n73099740816n
gtigjiishkaan:gotigojiishkam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 [see gdigjiishkaan]" ; !Rand key:n73031612490n
jaachiigaakndaan:jaachiigaakVv1ndam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 gnaw on sth. [sticklike]" ; !Rand key:n73082949576n
maandgon'aan:maandagonaham1    VTI_TAG    " 1 cover sth. completely [with sheetlike material], cover sth. up [with sheetlike material]" ; !Rand key:n71429179899n
mnaagmipdaan:minaagamipidam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 like the taste of sth. (of liquids)" ; !Rand key:n71430046380n
n'gaasdoon:nagaasidoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 stop sth. flying by, block sth. in motion" ; !Rand key:n73033652256n
naanaagdawaabndaan:naanaagadawaabandam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 look after sth. [for a long while], look sth. over carefully" ; !Rand key:n71431053448n
nitoon:nitoo    VTI_TAG    " 1 lose sth." ; !Rand key:n71433039004n
shoodnaan:ashoodinam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 press sth. on" ; !Rand key:n7303156344n
zaampidaan:zaamipidam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 overeat sth. and get sick of it" ; !Rand key:n73028855031n
zookoobiignaan:zookoobiiginam1    VTI_TAG    " 1 drain water from sth., wring water from sth." ; !Rand key:n73036024019n
ekwaa-dba’aan:ekwaa-dibaham1    VTI_TAG    " 1 finish paying sth. off, pay sth. off" ; !Rand key:n20162116-1-37n
LEXICON AV
aaniish:aaniish    AV_TAG    " 1 how?" ; !Rand key:n72973360551n
aasmidaaki:aasamidaaki    AV_TAG    " 1 on the hillside" ; !Rand key:n72974447099n
baataayiing:baataayiing    AV_TAG    " 1 beyond reach, out of reach, [in a place that's] hard to get at" ; !Rand key:n73097852425n
bgodkana:bagVo1dikana    AV_TAG    " 1 on a road out in the wilds" ; !Rand key:n72976841385n
bjiinak:bijiinag    AV_TAG    " 1 just [a short time ago, or a short time in the future];  2 as soon as;  3 only now, only then" ; !Rand key:n72977548957n
dbishkoo:dibishkoo    AV_TAG    " 1 as, like" ; !Rand key:n72994041485n
eshkam:eshkam    AV_TAG    " 1 increasingly, more and more " ; !Rand key:n73015783005n
gaamkana:agaamikana    AV_TAG    " 1 across the road, on the other side of the road" ; !Rand key:n73016050024n
gbe-shkwaa-naawkwe:gabe-ishkwaa-naawakwe    AV_TAG    " 1 all afternoon" ; !Rand key:n73017937172n
gegpii:gegapii    AV_TAG    " 1 finally;  2 eventually, sooner or later" ; !Rand key:n73020045617n
gidaaki:Va1gidaaki    AV_TAG    " 1 up the hill" ; !Rand key:n73021377823n
gijiyiinh:Va1gijiyiinh    AV_TAG    " 1 " ; !Rand key:n73024359282n
gyak:gwayak    AV_TAG    " 1 morally and/or behaviourally right, proper, good; correctly, properly; well-behaved;  2 correct, proper (physical circumstances);  3 straight" ; !Rand key:n73031720204n
jiigya'iing:jiigVv1yahiing    AV_TAG    " 1 [see jiigiyiing]" ; !Rand key:n73028439106n
mensaadkamik:menisaadakamig    AV_TAG    " 1 shamefully" ; !Rand key:n71429641611n
naamaazhbik:anaamaazhibik    AV_TAG    " 1 under the rocks" ; !Rand key:n71431052057n
nakeyaa:inakeyaa    AV_TAG    " 1 in a certain way, in a certain direction" ; !Rand key:n71431158425n
ngodsak:ningodosag    AV_TAG    " 1 one barrelful" ; !Rand key:n71431650900n
nnaash:ninaash    AV_TAG    " 1 just not [get around to something];  2 (for) an extended period of time;  3 until" ; !Rand key:n73033818000n
shawekna:ashawekana    AV_TAG    " 1 at the side of the road" ; !Rand key:n73031381859n
wiiba:wiiba    AV_TAG    " 1 early;  2 soon, in a short time" ; !Rand key:n73071960819n
de-mnik:de-minik    AV_TAG    " 1 a substantial amount, a fair amount;  2 enough, a sufficient amount" ; !Rand key:n65303457850n
gidbak:ogidabak    AV_TAG    " 1 on the roof" ; !Rand key:n201133019-39-16n
LEXICON PR_NA
gegii:gegii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 you, you (sg.), too" ; !Rand key:n73020042667n
gegiinwi:gegiinawi    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 we (including you) too;  2 us (including you) too" ; !Rand key:n73020043029n
genii:genii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 I, I, too, me, me, too" ; !Rand key:n73020043723n
geniinwi:geniinawi    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 us, (exc.), us (exc.), too, we (exc.), we (exc.), too" ; !Rand key:n73020043395n
gewii:gewii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 he, her, him, she, he, too, her, too, him, too, she, too" ; !Rand key:n73020082041n
gii:gii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 you (sg)" ; !Rand key:n73021378415n
giinwaa:giinawaa    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 you (pl.);  2 your (pl.), yours (pl.)" ; !Rand key:n73023657775n
giinwin:giinawin    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 we (including you);  2 us (including you);  3 our, ours (including you)" ; !Rand key:n73023657926n
giwedi:Va1giwedi    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 those (an.) over there" ; !Rand key:n73024536698n
giwik:Va1giwig    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 they (an.), those (an.)" ; !Rand key:n73042953559n
gondak:agondag    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 these" ; !Rand key:n7304365763n
nanda:nanda    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 he, it, she, these, they, this" ; !Rand key:n71431161324n
nii:nii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 I, me, my" ; !Rand key:n71431746272n
niinii:niinii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 I, me" ; !Rand key:n71431765074n
niw:Vi1niw    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 he, it, she, that, they, those" ; !Rand key:n71433039353n
niwi:Vi1niwi    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 he, it, she, that, they, those" ; !Rand key:n71433039866n
nonda:anonda    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 [see nanda]" ; !Rand key:n71433756193n
waya:awaya    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 any, anyone (singular and plural);  2 someone, some people, something (an.) (singular and plural)" ; !Rand key:n73032711921n
wegnesh:wegonesh    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 who, what (an.) (interrogative, used in asking questions);  2 which (one or ones) (interrogative, used in asking questions)" ; !Rand key:n73071882943n
wegwenh:awegwenh    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 [see wegwen]" ; !Rand key:n73032778337n
wii:wii    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 it (an.), her, him, she, he" ; !Rand key:n73033032150n
baaba:baaba    PR_NA_TAG    " 1 this, this one;  2 the" ; !Rand key:n65306589468n
